windows/es.aff
SFX Z   ir    ídmelas     ir
SFX Z   ir    ídmeles     ir
SFX Z   ir    ídselo      ir
SFX Z   ir    ídsela      ir
SFX Z   ir    ídsele      ir
SFX Z   ir    ídselos     ir
SFX Z   ir    ídselas     ir
SFX Z   ir    ídseles     ir
SFX Z   ir    íoslo       ir
SFX Z   ir    íosla       ir
SFX Z   ir    íosle       ir
SFX Z   ir    íoslos      ir
SFX Z   ir    íoslas      ir
SFX Z   ir    íosles      ir
SFX Z   ir    ídnoslo     ir
SFX Z   ir    ídnosla     ir
SFX Z   ir    ídnosle     ir
SFX Z   ir    ídnoslos    ir
SFX Z   ir    ídnoslas    ir
SFX Z   ir    ídnosles    ir

REP 37
REP b v
REP v b
REP á a
REP a á
REP é e
REP e é
REP í i
REP i í
REP ó o
REP o ó
REP ú u
REP u ú
REP ü u
REP u ü
REP ll y
REP y ll
REP ca ka
REP ka ca
REP je ge
REP ge je
REP ke que
REP ce ze
REP ze ce
REP ji gi
REP gi ji
REP ki qui
REP qui ki
REP ci zi
REP zi ci
REP co ko
REP cu ku
REP ku cu
REP ío ido
REP güe hue
REP hue güe
REP güi hui
REP hui güi
